California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 may, to the extent permitted by federal law, and subject to the limitations described in subparagraph (C), disclose to, and exchange with, one another information or a writing that may be designated as confidential under state law if the member of the team having that information or writing reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the identification, reduction, or elimination of barriers to services for, or to placement of, children and youth in foster care or to improve provision of those services or those placements.

(C) Members of the interagency leadership team, or its designees, who receive disclosed or exchanged information or a writing pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall destroy or return that information or writing once the purposes for which it was disclosed or exchanged are satisfied. The information or writing shall be used only for the purposes described in subparagraph
 (B). Any information or writing disclosed or exchanged pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall be confidential and shall not be open to public inspection, unless the information or writing is aggregated and deidentified in a manner that prevents the identification of an individual who is a subject of that information or writing. Any discussion concerning the disclosed or exchanged information or writing during a team meeting shall be confidential and shall not be open to public inspection.

(D) Members of an interagency placement committee, as defined in Section 4096, child abuse multidisciplinary personnel team, as defined in Section 18961.7, or child and family team, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, that is convened for the purpose of implementing the provisions of the memorandum of understanding developed pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with applicable statutory confidentiality provisions for that committee or team. Members of teams convened for purposes of implementing the memorandum of understanding shall comply with applicable records retention policies for their respective agencies or programs.

(4) To the extent possible, the implementation of the memorandum of understanding shall utilize existing processes and structures within and across the respective organizations that are parties to it.

(b) (1) (A) No later than June 1, 2019, the Secretary of California Health and Human Services and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish a joint interagency resolution team consisting of representatives from the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Developmental Services, and the State Department of Education.

(B) (i) The primary roles of the joint interagency resolution team shall be to develop guidance to counties, county offices of education, and regional centers with regard to developing the memoranda of understanding required by this section, to support the implementation of those memoranda of understanding, and to provide technical assistance to counties to identify and secure the appropriate level of services to meet the needs of children and youth in foster care who have experienced severe
 trauma.

(ii) The agencies shall ensure that a process is developed for counties and partner agencies that are parties to the memorandum of understanding to request interdepartmental technical assistance from the joint interagency resolution team.

(2) (A) No later than January 1, 2020, the joint interagency resolution team, in consultation with county agencies, service providers, and advocates for children and resource families, shall review the placement and service options available to county child welfare agencies and county probation departments for children and youth in foster care who have experienced severe trauma and shall develop and submit recommendations to the Legislature addressing any identified gaps in placement types or availability, needed services to resource families, or other identified issues.
 The joint interagency resolution team shall update its review and provide recommendations to the Legislature no later than December 31, 2022, that take into account the specific needs and characteristics of youth with unplanned discharges from short-term residential therapeutic programs and youth for whom counties were unable to, or have difficulty with, securing placements and providing trauma-informed services, which may include, but is not limited to, as applicable, youth impacted by commercial sexual exploitation, youth with acute behavioral needs, and youth with intellectual or developmental disabilities. The recommendations shall also articulate a statewide plan for any additional development needed for a trauma-informed, therapeutic continuum of care to support youth in-state in the least restrictive setting.

(B) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this
 paragraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) No later than June 1, 2020, the joint interagency resolution team, in consultation with county agencies, service providers, behavioral health professionals, schools of social work, and advocates for children and resource families, shall develop a multiyear plan for increasing the capacity and delivery of trauma-informed care to children and youth in foster care served by short-term residential therapeutic programs and other foster care and behavioral health providers.

(4) (A) Members of the joint interagency resolution team described in this subdivision may, to the extent permitted by federal law, and subject to the limitations described in subparagraph (B), disclose to, and exchange with, one another information or a writing that may be designated as confidential under
 state law if the member of the team or committee having that information or writing reasonably believes it is generally relevant to the identification, reduction, or elimination of barriers to services for, or to placement of, children and youth in foster care or to improve provision of those services or those placements.

(B) Members of the joint interagency resolution team who receive disclosed or exchanged information, or a writing, pursuant to subparagraph (A), shall destroy or return that information or writing once the purposes for which it was disclosed or exchanged are satisfied. The information or writing shall be used only for the purposes described in subparagraph (A). Any information or writing disclosed or exchanged pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be confidential and shall not be open to public inspection, unless the information or writing is aggregated and deidentified in a manner that prevents the identification of an
 individual who is a subject of that information or writing. Any discussion concerning the disclosed or exchanged information or writing during a team meeting shall be confidential and shall not be open to public inspection.

(5) The joint interagency resolution team shall track and report deidentified information of children and nonminor dependents in foster care who have been assisted to preserve, or secure new, intensive therapeutic options. This information shall be posted on the internet website of the California Health and Human Services Agency beginning July 1, 2022, shall be updated annually, and shall include the number of children and nonminor dependents served through its technical assistance process, characteristics of individuals served, and, as applicable, local and statewide systemic issues identified by the team.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 50.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

16521.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to establish a methodology for reconciling the state’s and each county’s costs and savings resulting from implementation of the Continuum of Care Reform (CCR), as directed through legislation and administrative directives, in light of the requirements of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, which pertains to state or federal legislation enacted after September 30, 2012, that has an overall effect of increasing the costs already borne by a local agency for certain programs or levels of service.

(b) The Department of Finance, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation
 Officers of California, and the California State Association of Counties, shall develop and implement a methodology for determining the state’s and each county’s overall actual costs and savings resulting from the CCR initiative. The methodology shall take into account the CCR-related assistance and administration costs and savings of the state and each county associated with the implementation of the CCR initiative, based on the best available data.

(c) (1) The overall CCR-related assistance and administration costs and savings for each county shall be reconciled at least once for each fiscal year, beginning in the 2018–19 fiscal year, to determine the amount of state funding, if any, that is owed to each county or the amount of county savings, if any, that are available to offset state funding from the General Fund. The Department of Finance, in collaboration with the entities listed in subdivision (b), shall determine
 the process by which any state funding owed to counties is provided or any county savings offsets state funding.

(2) If any state funding owed is not provided to the county, the county is not obligated to continue implementation of the CCR initiative beyond the level of state funding provided.

(3) The overall CCR-related assistance and administration costs and savings of each county incurred since July 1, 2016, shall be included in the first reconciliation done pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 37.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16521.8.

(a) (1) A child welfare public health nursing early intervention program shall be conducted in the County of Los Angeles, as provided in this section, and with the county’s consent. The purpose of the program is to improve outcomes for the expanded population of youth at risk of entering the foster care system by maximizing access to health care and health education, and connecting youth and families to safety net services. It is the intent of the Legislature for the program to maximize the use of county public health nurses in the field in order to provide families with children who are at risk of being placed in the child welfare system with preventative services to meet their medical, mental, and behavioral health needs.

(2) The
 program shall be administered by the Los Angeles County Department of Public Health (DPH), in cooperation with the county’s Department of Children and Family Services (DCFS).

(3) Funding appropriated for purposes of the program shall be used for, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Hiring a sufficient number of new public health nurses, with the goal of achieving an average caseload ratio of 200:1.

(B) Hiring additional public health nursing supervisors to provide necessary guidance and support.

(C) Hiring senior and intermediate typist clerks to assist with data entry.

(D) Establishing an accountability mechanism and a shared information and data exchange system.

(b) A county public health nurse providing services under the program may do all of the following:

(1) Respond to emergency response referrals with social workers.

(2) Conduct emergency and routine home visits with social workers.

(3) Educate social workers on behavioral, mental and physical health conditions.

(4) Identify behavioral and health conditions that social workers are not trained to identify.

(5) Provide followup with families of youth who remain in the home to monitor compliance with the medical, dental, and mental health care plans to promote wellbeing and minimize repeat referrals.

(6) Conduct routine followups and monitoring of medically fragile and medically at-risk children and youth in the Family Maintenance and Reunification programs.

(7) Provide parents and guardians with educational tools and resources to ensure the child’s physical, mental, and behavioral health needs are being met.

(8) Interpret medical records and reports for social workers.

(c) (1) The DPH, in cooperation with the DCFS, shall develop appropriate outcome measures to determine the effectiveness of the program, including established triaging tools and visitation protocols, in achieving the objectives described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). Commencing on January 1 during the fiscal year when funding has been provided to the DPH by
 the State Department of Social Services, and each January 1 thereafter, the DPH shall report to the Legislature on the effectiveness of the program using those outcome measures, including any recommendations for continuation or expansion of the program.

(2) A report submitted under this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) Before January 1, 2021, and to the extent enabled by existing resources or appropriated funds, the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the County of Los Angeles, shall determine the steps required to seek any federal approvals necessary to claim federal financial participation for those allowable Medicaid activities of the program described in subdivision (a) and shall seek any federal approvals necessary to claim federal financial participation available
 for those identified Medicaid activities.

(2) The County of Los Angeles shall submit to the State Department of Health Care Services any information deemed relevant to the determination described in paragraph (1) at the time and in the form and manner specified by that department.

(3) With respect to any Medicaid activities identified pursuant to paragraph (1) for which federal approval is sought, those activities shall be implemented only to the extent that the State Department of Health Care Services obtains any necessary federal Medicaid approvals.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins, plan letters, or
 other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(e) Contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the State Department of Social Services shall provide funds to the DPH for the purposes described in this section.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, any state funds annually appropriated to the State Department of Social Services for the purposes described this section that are not used as the nonfederal share for Medicaid expenditures approved pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be passed through in a single lump-sum to the DPH.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 51.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transitional Housing Placement Program [16522. - 16522.6.]

16522.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall license transitional housing placement providers that provide supervised transitional housing services to foster children who are at least 16 years of age pursuant to Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Transitional Housing Program-Plus providers, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 11400, shall not be subject to licensure pursuant to Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code, if they are certified to provide transitional housing by the applicable county and have obtained a local fire clearance.

(c) By July 31, 2012, the department shall establish
 certification standards and procedures for the Transitional Housing Placement
 program for nonminor dependents as described in subdivision (c) of Section 16522.1, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, the California Youth Connection, county probation departments, provider representatives, and other stakeholders, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 731, Sec. 11.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16522.1.

(a) In order to be licensed as a transitional housing placement provider pursuant to Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code and be eligible for payment of AFDC-FC benefits pursuant to Sections 11403.2 and 11403.3, an applicant shall obtain certification from the applicable county specifying whether the facility will serve foster youth at least 16 years of age and not more than 18 years of age, nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, or both, as follows:

(1) A program serving foster children at least 16 years of age and not more than 18 years of age shall obtain a certification entitled “Transitional Housing Placement program for minor foster children.”

(2) A
 program serving nonminor dependents at least 18 years of age and not more than 21 years of age shall obtain a certification entitled a “Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor dependents.”

(b) The certification for the Transitional Housing Placement program for minor foster children shall confirm that the program provides for all of the following:

(1) Admission criteria for participants in the program, including, but not limited to, consideration of the participant’s age, previous placement history, delinquency history, history of drug or alcohol abuse, current strengths, level of education, mental health history, medical history, prospects for successful participation in the program, and work experience. Youth who are wards of the court described in Section 602 and youth receiving psychotropic medications shall be eligible for consideration to participate in the
 program, and shall not be automatically excluded due to these factors.

(2) The department shall review the admission criteria to ensure that the criteria are sufficient to protect participants and that they do not discriminate on the basis of any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(3) Strict employment criteria that include a consideration of the employee’s age, drug or alcohol history, and experience in working with persons in this age group.

(4) A training program designed to educate employees who work directly with participants about the characteristics of persons in this age group placed in long-term care settings, and designed to ensure that these employees are able to adequately supervise and counsel participants and to provide them with training in independent living
 skills.

(5) A detailed plan for monitoring the placement of persons under the licensee’s care.

(6) A contract between the participant and the licensee that specifically sets out the requirements for each party, and in which the licensee and the participant agree to the requirements of this article.

(7) An allowance to be provided to each participant in the program. In the case of a participant living independently, this allowance shall be sufficient for the participant to purchase food and other necessities.

(8) A system for payment for utilities, telephone, and rent.

(9) Policies regarding all of the following:

(A) Education
 requirements.

(B) Work expectations.

(C) Savings requirements.

(D) Personal safety.

(E) Visitors, including, but not limited to, visitation by the placement auditor pursuant to paragraph (5).

(F) Emergencies.

(G) Medical problems.

(H) Disciplinary measures.

(I) Childcare.

(J) Pregnancy.

(K) Curfew.

(L) Housing unit cleanliness.

(M) Use of utilities and telephone.

(N) Budgeting.

(O) Care of furnishings.

(P) Decorating of housing units.

(Q) Cars.

(R) Lending or borrowing money.

(S) Unauthorized purchases.

(T) Dating.

(U) Grounds for termination that may include, but shall not be limited to, illegal activities or harboring runaways.

(V) The approval of
 any nonparticipant roommates.

(10) Housing unit furnishings, and a policy on disposition of the furnishings when the participant completes the program.

(11) Evaluation of the participant’s progress in the program and reporting to the independent living program and to the department regarding that progress.

(12) A linkage to the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2801 et seq.) program administered in the local area to provide employment training to eligible participants.

(13) Effective January 1, 2013, a program staffing ratio of case manager to participant not to exceed 1 to 12.

(c) The certification for the Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor
 dependents shall confirm that the program provides for all of the following:

(1) That the program is needed by the county.

(2) That the transitional housing placement provider is capable of effectively and efficiently operating the program.

(3) That the transitional housing placement provider is willing and able to accept the AFDC-FC-eligible nonminor dependents for placement by the placing agency who need the level of care and services that will be provided by the program.

(4) That the plan of operation is suitable to meet the needs of the identified population.

(5) Maintain a program staffing ratio for nonminor dependents of case manager to participant not to exceed a shared average
 caseload of 1 to 12, inclusive, with a designated lead case manager assigned to each youth.

(6) That the provider has established a process, which includes the county if the county chooses to participate, to evaluate whether a participant may be placed with a nonparticipant.

(d) (1) A county may continue to approve payment to a transitional housing placement provider for a period of up to 14 days in a calendar month in which the nonminor dependent is absent from the placement if the nonminor dependent provides notice to the transitional housing placement provider that they intend to return to that placement within 14 days or the transitional housing placement provider has reason to believe the nonminor dependent will be returning within 14 days.

(2) If the county continues to pay the board and
 care costs for up to 14 days during the nonminor dependent’s absence, the transitional housing placement provider shall not provide a removal notice or fill a nonminor dependent’s place in the program.

(3) The State Department of Social Services shall issue guidance encouraging counties to continue to approve payment during temporary absences from the program as a best practice, consistent with federal law, to prevent nonminor dependent housing instability.

(e) For purposes of this section, “applicable county” means the county where the administrative office or subadministrative office of a transitional housing placement provider is located or a primary placing county.

(f) (1) If a county contracts with a transitional housing placement provider, the
 contract shall not contain terms that create unreasonable barriers for a qualified foster youth’s admission into or participation in the program. The contract shall be developed to provide maximum flexibility to meet the needs of the minor dependents and nonminor dependents served by the programs in the specific county contracting with the provider. The contract shall be developed with the understanding that, unless modified by a court order, a nonminor dependent has the same legal decisionmaking authority as an adult.

(2) The department is not required to review the contract described in paragraph (1). This subdivision does not require a county to enter into a contract with a transitional housing placement provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.   (AB 1314)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

16522.2.

(a) Eligible persons may receive transitional housing only with the permission of both the independent living program of the county in which the program is located and the county department of social services or the county probation department that has custody of the person.

(b) This section does not apply to a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 139.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16522.5.

Prior to county certification of any program to be provided by a transitional housing placement provider, the department shall approve a plan submitted by the county’s independent living program that includes assurances that the independent living program shall participate actively in the screening of candidates for this program and shall assist the licensed agency in the supervision of participants participating in the program. This section does not apply to nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 731, Sec. 13.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16522.6.

The department shall make information available to the Legislature upon request regarding services rendered pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 799, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Bringing Families Home Program [16523. - 16523.2.]

16523.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Child welfare services” means either of the following:

(1) The same meaning as defined in Section 16501, including those services provided by a tribe, or tribal entity or agency.

(2) Child welfare services provided by a tribe, or tribal entity or agency, in accordance with tribal law or custom, if the tribe, or tribal entity or agency, provides at least one of the services described in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(c) “Eligible family” means any individual or family that, at a minimum, meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Receives child welfare services at the time eligibility is determined.

(2) Is homeless, is at risk of homelessness, or is in a living situation that cannot accommodate the child or multiple children in the home, which may include, but is not limited to, individuals who have not yet received an eviction notice.

(3) Voluntarily agrees to participate in the program.

(4) Either of the following:

(A) Has been determined appropriate for
 reunification of a child to a biological parent or guardian by the county human services agency or tribe handling the case, the court with jurisdiction over the child, or both.

(B) A child or children in the family is or are at risk of foster care placement, and the county human services agency or tribe determines that safe and stable housing for the family will prevent the need for the child’s or children’s removal from the parent or guardian.

(d) “Homeless” means any of the following:

(1) An individual or family who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence.

(2) An individual or family with a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human
 beings, including, but not limited to, a car, park, abandoned building, bus station, train station, airport, or camping ground.

(3) An individual or family living in a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designated to provide temporary living arrangements, including hotels or motels paid for by federal, state, or local government programs for low-income individuals or by charitable organizations, congregate shelters, or transitional housing.

(4) An individual who resided in a shelter or place not meant for human habitation and who is exiting an institution where the individual temporarily resided.

(5) An individual or family who will imminently lose their housing, including, but not limited to, housing they own, rent, or live in without paying rent, are sharing with others, or rooms in hotels or motels
 not paid for by federal, state, or local government programs for low-income individuals or by charitable organizations, if any of the following criteria are met:

(A) The primary nighttime residence will be lost within 14 days, as evidenced by any of the following:

(i) A court order resulting from an eviction action that notifies the individual or family that they must leave within 14 days.

(ii) The individual or family having a primary nighttime residence that is a room in a hotel or motel and where they lack the resources necessary to reside there for more than 14 days.

(iii) Credible evidence indicating that the owner or renter of the housing will not allow the individual or family to stay for more than 14 days, and any oral statement from an
 individual or family seeking homeless assistance that is found to be credible shall be considered credible evidence for purposes of this clause.

(B) The individual or family has no subsequent residence identified.

(C) The individual or family lacks the resources or support networks needed to obtain other permanent housing.

(6) Unaccompanied youth and homeless families with children and youth defined as homeless under any other federal statute, as of the effective date of this program, who meet all of the following:

(A) Have experienced a long-term period without living independently in permanent housing.

(B) Have experienced persistent instability as measured by frequent moves over that
 long-term period.

(C) Can be expected to continue in that status for an extended period of time because of chronic disabilities, chronic physical health or mental health conditions, substance addiction, histories of domestic violence or childhood abuse, the presence of a child or youth with a disability, or multiple barriers to employment.

(7) An individual or family who meets all of the following:

(A) Is fleeing, or is attempting to flee, domestic violence, dating violence, sexual assault, stalking, or other dangerous or life-threatening conditions that relate to violence against the individual or family member, including a
 child, that has either taken place within the individual’s or family’s primary nighttime residence or has made the individual or family afraid to return to their primary nighttime residence.

(B) Has no other residence.

(C) Lacks the resources or support networks, including, but not limited to, family, friends, or faith-based or other social networks, to obtain other permanent housing.

(e) “Homelessness” means the status of being homeless, as defined in subdivision (d).

(f) “Permanent housing” means a place to live
 without a predetermined limit on the length of stay, subject to landlord-tenant laws pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(g) “Program” means the Bringing Families Home Program established pursuant to this article.

(h) “Supportive housing” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50675.14 of the Health and Safety Code, except that the program is not restricted to serving only projects with five or more units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 75.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.1.

(a) To the extent funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act, the department shall award program funds to counties and tribal governments for the purpose of providing housing-related supports to eligible families experiencing homelessness if that homelessness prevents reunification between an eligible family and a child receiving child welfare services, or where lack of housing prevents a parent or guardian from addressing issues that could lead to foster care placement.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not create an entitlement to housing-related assistance, which is intended to be provided at the discretion of the county or tribe as a service to eligible families.

(c) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that housing-related assistance provided pursuant to this article utilize evidence-based models, including evidence-based practices in rapid rehousing and supportive housing.

(2) Housing-related supports available to participating families shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) An assessment of each family’s housing and service needs, including a plan to assist them in meeting those needs, using an assessment tool developed in the local community or an assessment tool used in other jurisdictions.

(B) Housing navigation or search assistance to recruit landlords, and assist families in locating housing affordable to the family.

(C) The use of evidence-based
 models, such as motivational interviewing and trauma-informed care, to build relationships with a parent or guardian.

(D) Housing-related financial assistance, including rental assistance, security deposit assistance, utility payments, moving cost assistance, and interim housing assistance while housing navigators are actively seeking permanent housing options for the family.

(E) (i) Housing stabilization services, including ongoing tenant engagement, case management, public systems assistance, legal services, credit repair assistance, life skills training, and conflict mediation with landlords and neighbors.

(ii) Services provided pursuant to clause (i) shall be provided with input from the family, based on the needs of the family, and in coordination with other services being provided by child
 welfare services or tribes, family resource centers, family courts, and other services.

(F) If the family requires supportive housing, long-term housing through tenant or project-based rental assistance or operating subsidies and services promoting housing stability, subject to available funding pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) The department shall award program funds to county child welfare agencies and tribes according to criteria developed by the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Corporation for Supportive Housing, and Housing California, subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B), a county or tribe that receives state funds under this program shall match that funding on a
 dollar-by-dollar basis. The county or tribal funds used for this purpose shall supplement, not supplant, county or tribal funding already intended for these purposes.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2021, a county or tribe that receives state funds under this article shall not be required to match any funding.

(2) A county or tribe that receives state funds under this program shall partner with a local homeless continuum of care that
 participates in a homeless services coordinated entry and assessment system, as required by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(3) A county or tribe that receives state funds under the program shall utilize a cross-agency liaison to coordinate activities under the program with the homeless continuum of care and the county child welfare or tribal agency, including housing-related and child welfare services for families.

(e) The department, in consultation with Housing California, the Corporation for Supportive Housing, and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop all of the following:

(1) The criteria by which counties and tribal governments may be awarded funds to provide housing-related assistance to eligible families pursuant to this article.

(2) The proportion of program funding to be expended on reasonable and appropriate administrative activities to minimize overhead and maximize services.

(3) Eligible sources of funds for a county’s or tribe’s matching contribution.

(4) Tracking and reporting procedures for the program.

(5) A process for evaluating program data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 28.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.2.

(a) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer the changes made to this article by the act that added this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department that shall have the same force and effect as regulations until regulations are adopted.

(b) The department shall adopt regulations implementing this article no later than July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 77.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Continuum of Care Reform Oversight [16523.5. - 16523.59.]

16523.5.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the California State Association of Counties representing the counties, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and the Chief Probation Officers of California shall provide quarterly in-person updates to the Legislature on progress toward the implementation of Continuum of Care Reform (CCR).

(b) Specific components of the updates described in subdivision (a) shall cease when notification by the applicable party of the completion of a specific activity occurs or when it is agreed by all parties that a component is no longer necessary for other reasons.

(c) The updates described in subdivision (a) shall include the updates specified in Sections 16523.51 to 16523.56, inclusive.

(d) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “CANS” means the Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths assessment tool.

(2) “Child and family team” or “CFT” has the same meaning as provided in Section 16501.

(3) “Continuum of Care Reform” or “CCR” means the Continuum of Care Reform enacted by Chapter 773 of the Statutes of 2015, Chapter 612 of the Statutes of 2016, Chapter 732 of the Statutes of 2017, and Chapter 910 of the Statutes of 2018.

(4) “Department” means the State
 Department of Social Services, unless otherwise specified.

(5) “Foster family agency” or “FFA” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) “Group home” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(7) “Intensive services foster care” has the same meaning as provided in Section 18360.

(8) “LOCP” means level of care protocol.

(9) “Resource family approval” or “RFA” has the same meaning as provided in Section 16519.5.

(10) “Short-term residential therapeutic program” or “STRTP” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(11) “Temporary shelter care facility” has the same meaning as provided in Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 105.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16523.51.
